Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16A.092] DO NOT PAY DATABASE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Do not pay database. new text end new text begin The commissioner, with assistance from the commissioner of information technology services, must maintain a database of individuals or businesses who are prohibited from receiving state money. The commissioner must add a person to the database when the person passes away, is convicted of or suspected of fraud against the state, or owes money to the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Contributions from all agencies. new text end new text begin All state agencies must provide names and data to the commissioner for addition to the database when the agency determines that a person has passed away, is convicted of or suspected of fraud against the state, or owes money to the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Confirmation of status before action. new text end new text begin The commissioner must make the database available to agencies. Before entering a contract or making a payment, an agency must check the name of a vendor or payment recipient against the database to ensure the person or business is eligible to contract or receive a payment. new text end